apertium-sme-smj.sme.lexc
LEXICON GAVCCICIHCCETLOHKAI
 +Num+Sg+Nom:%>X4#čihččet#lohká%>j K ;
 +Num+Ess:%>X4#čihččet#lohki%>n K ;
 +Num+Ess:%>X4#čihččet#logi%>n K ;
 +Num+Sg+Acc:%>X4#čihččet#lohká%>j K ;
 +Num+Sg+Gen:%>X4#čihččet#logi%> K ;
 +Num+Sg+Gen:%>X4#čihččet#logi»# NUMERALCOMPOUNDS ;            ! golmmagielat
 +Num+Sg+Nom+Attr:%>X4#čihččet#lot»# NUMERALCOMPOUNDS ;            ! golmmagielat
 +Num+Sg+Nom+Attr:%>X4#čihččet#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Sg+Nom+Attr:%>X5jn#čihččet#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Sg+Nom+Attr:%>n#čihččet#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Sg+Acc+Attr:%>X4#čihččet#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Sg+Acc+Attr:%>X5jn#čihččet#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Sg+Acc+Attr:%>n#čihččet#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Sg+Loc:%>X4#čihččet#logi%>s K ;
 +Num+Sg+Loc+Use/Sub:%>X4#čihččet#logi%>n K ; ! !SOUTH
 +Num+Pl+Nom:%>X4#čihččet#logi%>t K ;
 +Num+Sg+Ill:%>X4#čihččet#lohká%>j K ;
 +Num+Sg+Com:%>X5jn#čihččet#logi%>jn K ;
 +Num+Pl+Acc:%>X4#čihččet#logi%>X5jd K ;
 +Num+Pl+Gen:%>X4#čihččet#logi%>X5jd K ;
 +Num+Pl+Ill:%>X4#čihččet#logi%>jde K ;
 +Num+Pl+Loc:%>X5jn#čihččet#logi%>jn K ;
 +Num+Pl+Com:%>X4#čihččet#logi%>jgujn K ;
 +Num+Sg+Nom:%>X4#čihččet#lohká%>j K ;
 +Num+Pl+Loc:%>X4#čihččet#logi%>jn K ; !Nickel 91 from here downwards
 +Num+Pl+Attr:%>X4t#čihččet#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Pl+Attr:%>X5jd#čihččet#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Pl+Attr:%>X5jn#čihččet#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Pl+Nom:%>X4t#čihččet#logi%>t K ;
 +Num+Pl+Acc:%>X5jd#čihččet#logi%>X5jd K ;
 +Num+Pl+Gen+Use/Sub:%>X5jd#čihččet#logi%>X5jd K ; ! because of speller
 +Num+Pl+Ill+Use/Sub:%>X5jd#čihččet#logi%>X5jd K ; ! because of speller
 +Num+Pl+Com+Use/Sub:%>X5jd#čihččet#logi%>X5jd K ; ! because of speller
 +Num+Pl+Ess:%>X4t#čihččet#logi%>n K ;

LEXICON GAVCCIGAVCCATLOHKAI
 +Num+Sg+Nom:%>#gávccát#lohká%>j K ;
 +Num+Ess:%>X4#gávccát#lohki%>n K ;
 +Num+Ess:%>X4#gávccát#logi%>n K ;
 +Num+Sg+Acc:%>X4#gávccát#lohká%>j K ;
 +Num+Sg+Gen:%>X4#gávccát#logi%> K ;
 +Num+Sg+Gen:%>X4#gávccát#logi»# NUMERALCOMPOUNDS ;            ! golmmagielat
 +Num+Sg+Nom+Attr:%>X4#gávccát#lot»# NUMERALCOMPOUNDS ;            ! golmmagielat
 +Num+Sg+Nom+Attr:%>X4#gávccát#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Sg+Nom+Attr:%>X5jn#gávccát#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Sg+Nom+Attr:%>n#gávccát#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Sg+Acc+Attr:%>X4#gávccát#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Sg+Acc+Attr:%>X5jn#gávccát#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Sg+Acc+Attr:%>n#gávccát#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Sg+Loc:%>X4#gávccát#logi%>s K ;
 +Num+Sg+Loc+Use/Sub:%>X4#gávccát#logi%>n K ; ! !SOUTH
 +Num+Pl+Nom:%>X4#gávccát#logi%>t K ;
 +Num+Sg+Ill:%>X4#gávccát#lohká%>j K ;
 +Num+Sg+Com:%>X5jn#gávccát#logi%>jn K ;
 +Num+Pl+Acc:%>X4#gávccát#logi%>X5jd K ;
 +Num+Pl+Gen:%>X4#gávccát#logi%>X5jd K ;
 +Num+Pl+Ill:%>X4#gávccát#logi%>jde K ;
 +Num+Pl+Loc:%>X5jn#gávccát#logi%>jn K ;
 +Num+Pl+Com:%>X4#gávccát#logi%>jgujn K ;
 +Num+Pl+Loc:%>X4#gávccát#logi%>jn K ; !Nickel 91 from here downwards
 +Num+Pl+Attr:%>X4t#gávccát#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Pl+Attr:%>X5jd#gávccát#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Pl+Attr:%>X5jn#gávccát#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Pl+Nom:%>X4t#gávccát#logi%>t K ;
 +Num+Pl+Acc:%>X5jd#gávccát#logi%>X5jd K ;
 +Num+Pl+Gen+Use/Sub:%>X5jd#gávccát#logi%>X5jd K ; ! because of speller
 +Num+Pl+Ill+Use/Sub:%>X5jd#gávccát#logi%>X5jd K ; ! because of speller
 +Num+Pl+Com+Use/Sub:%>X5jd#gávccát#logi%>X5jd K ; ! because of speller
 +Num+Pl+Ess:%>X4t#gávccát#logi%>n K ;

LEXICON GAVCCIOVCCATLOHKAI
 +Num+Sg+Nom:%>X4#ovccát#lohká%>j K ;
 +Num+Ess:%>X4#ovccát#lohki%>n K ;
 +Num+Ess:%>X4#ovccát#logi%>n K ;
 +Num+Sg+Acc:%>X4#ovccát#lohká%>j K ;
 +Num+Sg+Gen:%>X4#ovccát#logi%> K ;
 +Num+Sg+Gen:%>X4#ovccát#logi»# NUMERALCOMPOUNDS ;            ! golmmagielat
 +Num+Sg+Nom+Attr:%>X4#ovccát#lot»# NUMERALCOMPOUNDS ;            ! golmmagielat
 +Num+Sg+Nom+Attr:%>X4#ovccát#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Sg+Nom+Attr:%>X5jn#ovccát#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Sg+Nom+Attr:%>n#ovccát#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Sg+Acc+Attr:%>X4#ovccát#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Sg+Acc+Attr:%>X5jn#ovccát#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Sg+Acc+Attr:%>n#ovccát#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Sg+Loc:%>X4#ovccát#logi%>s K ;
 +Num+Sg+Loc+Use/Sub:%>X4#ovccát#logi%>n K ; ! !SOUTH
 +Num+Pl+Nom:%>X4#ovccát#logi%>t K ;
 +Num+Sg+Ill:%>X4#ovccát#lohká%>j K ;
 +Num+Sg+Com:%>X5jn#ovccát#logi%>jn K ;
 +Num+Pl+Acc:%>X4#ovccát#logi%>X5jd K ;
 +Num+Pl+Gen:%>X4#ovccát#logi%>X5jd K ;
 +Num+Pl+Ill:%>X4#ovccát#logi%>jde K ;
 +Num+Pl+Loc:%>X5jn#ovccát#logi%>jn K ;
 +Num+Pl+Com:%>X4#ovccát#logi%>jgujn K ;
 +Num+Sg+Nom:%>X4#ovccát#lohká%>j K ;
 +Num+Pl+Loc:%>X4#ovccát#logi%>jn K ; !Nickel 91 from here downwards
 +Num+Pl+Attr:%>X4t#ovccát#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Pl+Attr:%>X5jd#ovccát#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Pl+Attr:%>X5jn#ovccát#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Pl+Nom:%>X4t#ovccát#logi%>t K ;
 +Num+Pl+Acc:%>X5jd#ovccát#logi%>X5jd K ;
 +Num+Pl+Gen+Use/Sub:%>X5jd#ovccát#logi%>X5jd K ; ! because of speller
 +Num+Pl+Ill+Use/Sub:%>X5jd#ovccát#logi%>X5jd K ; ! because of speller
 +Num+Pl+Com+Use/Sub:%>X5jd#ovccát#logi%>X5jd K ; ! because of speller
 +Num+Pl+Ess:%>X4t#ovccát#logi%>n K ;

LEXICON GAVCCILOGATLOHKAI
 +Num+Sg+Nom:%>#logát#lohká%>j K ;
 +Num+Ess:%>X4#logát#lohki%>n K ;
 +Num+Ess:%>X4#logát#logi%>n K ;
 +Num+Sg+Acc:%>X4#logát#lohká%>j K ;
 +Num+Sg+Gen:%>X4#logát#logi%> K ;
 +Num+Sg+Gen:%>X4#logát#logi»# NUMERALCOMPOUNDS ;            ! golmmagielat
 +Num+Sg+Nom+Attr:%>X4#logát#lot»# NUMERALCOMPOUNDS ;            ! golmmagielat
 +Num+Sg+Nom+Attr:%>X4#logát#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Sg+Nom+Attr:%>X5jn#logát#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Sg+Nom+Attr:%>n#logát#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Sg+Acc+Attr:%>X4#logát#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Sg+Acc+Attr:%>X5jn#logát#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Sg+Acc+Attr:%>n#logát#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Sg+Loc:%>X4#logát#logi%>s K ;
 +Num+Sg+Loc+Use/Sub:%>X4#logát#logi%>n K ; ! !SOUTH
 +Num+Pl+Nom:%>X4#logát#logi%>t K ;
 +Num+Sg+Ill:%>X4#logát#lohká%>j K ;
 +Num+Sg+Com:%>X5jn#logát#logi%>jn K ;
 +Num+Pl+Acc:%>X4#logát#logi%>X5jd K ;
 +Num+Pl+Gen:%>X4#logát#logi%>X5jd K ;
 +Num+Pl+Ill:%>X4#logát#logi%>jde K ;
 +Num+Pl+Loc:%>X5jn#logát#logi%>jn K ;
 +Num+Pl+Com:%>X4#logát#logi%>jgujn K ;
 +Num+Pl+Loc:%>X4#logát#logi%>jn K ; !Nickel 91 from here downwards
 +Num+Pl+Attr:%>X4t#logát#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Pl+Attr:%>X5jd#logát#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Pl+Attr:%>X5jn#logát#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Pl+Nom:%>X4t#logát#logi%>t K ;
 +Num+Pl+Acc:%>X5jd#logát#logi%>X5jd K ;
 +Num+Pl+Gen+Use/Sub:%>X5jd#logát#logi%>X5jd K ; ! because of speller
 +Num+Pl+Ill+Use/Sub:%>X5jd#logát#logi%>X5jd K ; ! because of speller
 +Num+Pl+Com+Use/Sub:%>X5jd#logát#logi%>X5jd K ; ! because of speller
 +Num+Pl+Ess:%>X4t#logát#logi%>n K ;

LEXICON 11TO99F
gávcci#čihččet#lohkái:gák'ci GAVCCICIHCCETLOHKAI ;
gávcci#gávccát#lohkái:gák'ci GAVCCIGAVCCATLOHKAI ;
gávcci#ovccát#lohkái:gák'ci GAVCCIOVCCATLOHKAI ;
gávcci#logát#lohkái:gák'ci GAVCCILOGATLOHKAI ;
ovcci#čihččet#lohkái:ok'ci GAVCCICIHCCETLOHKAI ;
ovcci#gávccát#lohkái:ok'ci GAVCCIGAVCCATLOHKAI ;
ovcci#ovccát#lohkái:ok'ci GAVCCIOVCCATLOHKAI ;
ovcci#logát#lohkái:ok'ci GAVCCILOGATLOHKAI ;
LEXICON 111TO119
gávcci#čihččet#lohkái:gák'ci GAVCCICIHCCETLOHKAI ;
gávcci#gávccát#lohkái:gák'ci GAVCCIGAVCCATLOHKAI ;
gávcci#ovccát#lohkái:gák'ci GAVCCIOVCCATLOHKAI ;
gávcci#logát#lohkái:gák'ci GAVCCILOGATLOHKAI ;
ovcci#čihččet#lohkái:ok'ci GAVCCICIHCCETLOHKAI ;
ovcci#gávccát#lohkái:ok'ci GAVCCIGAVCCATLOHKAI ;
ovcci#ovccát#lohkái:ok'ci GAVCCIOVCCATLOHKAI ;
ovcci#logát#lohkái:ok'ci GAVCCILOGATLOHKAI ;
